Massachusetts, session 194th, S2167.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after section 22O, the following new section:- 
Section 22P. USE OF AMERICAN MATERIALS 
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary relating to procurement, 
and to the extent permitted by federal law, a state or municipal agency or authority shall, after 
giving preference pursuant to the provision of section 22O of this chapter for each contract for 
the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of a public 
building or public works made by a public agency shall contain a provision that the iron, steel, 
fabricated steel, and manufactured goods used or supplied in the performance of the contract or 
any subcontract thereto shall be manufactured in the United States. 

of 4 11  (b) The provisions of subsection 
(a) of this section shall not apply in any case or category of cases in which the executive 
head of a public agency finds — 
(1) that their application would be inconsistent with the public interest; 
(2) that such materials and products are not produced in the United States in 
sufficient and reasonably available quantities and of a satisfactory quality; or 
(3) that inclusion of domestic material will increase the cost of the overall project 
contract by more than 25 percent. 
(c) If the executive head of a public agency receives a request for a waiver under 
subsection (b), the agency shall provide notice of and an opportunity for public comment on the 
request at least 30 days before making a finding based on the request. 
(A.) A notice provided under subparagraph (A) shall — 
(i) include the information available to the Secretary concerning the request, including 
whether the request is being made under subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3); and 
(ii) be provided by electronic means, including on the official public Internet Web site of 
the agency. 
(B) If the Secretary issues a waiver under subsection (b), the Secretary shall publish in 
the [applicable state record] a detailed justification for the waiver that — 
(i) addresses the public comments received under paragraph (c)(A); and 

of 4 30  (ii) is published before the waiver takes effect. 
(d) Intentional Violations. If it has been determined by a court or Federal or State agency 
that any person intentionally — 
(1) affixed a label bearing a "Made in America" inscription, or any inscription with the 
same meaning, to any iron, steel, fabricated steel, or manufactured good used in projects to 
which this section applies, sold in or shipped to the United States that was not made in the 
United States; or 
(2) represented that any iron, steel, fabricated steel, or manufactured good used in 
projects to which this section applies that was not produced in the United States, was produced in 
the United States; that person shall be ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract with this 
State. The Attorney General is authorized to enforce the provision of the section. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 30B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 20, the following new section: 
Section 20A. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and to the 
extent permitted by federal law, any governmental body subject to the provisions of this chapter 
shall require, in all contracts pertaining to any construction project exceeding $500,000, for each 
contract for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of a 
public building or public works made by a public agency shall contain a provision that the iron, 
steel, fabricated steel, and manufactured goods used or supplied in the performance of the 
contract or any subcontract thereto shall be manufactured in the United States. 

of 4 50  (b) The provisions of subsection (a) may not apply if less than three steel manufacturers 
and/or fabricators located in the United States have submitted responsive bids under the 
provisions of this chapter. 
(c) If any provision of this chapter or application thereof is held to be invalid or in 
conflict with any applicable laws, this invalidity or conflict shall not affect the other provisions 
or applications which shall be given affect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to 
this end, the provisions and applications of this chapter are severable.